Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201684-602.01
Taxpayer Transparency Act.

Sections 84-602.01 to 84-602.04 shall be known and may be cited as the Taxpayer Transparency Act.

Laws 2009, LB16, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB851, § 2.
July 21, 2016